District of Columbia statutes.
16-402

Prohibitions and penalties.

(a)

Surrogate parenting contracts are prohibited and rendered unenforceable in the District.

(b)

Any person or entity who or which is involved in, or induces, arranges, or otherwise assists in the formation of a surrogate parenting contract for a fee, compensation, or other remuneration, or otherwise violates this section, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both.

History

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-219, § 2, 40 DCR 582
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 18(b), 44 DCR 1271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-402.